Vermont, session 2025-2026, S285.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. POLICIES TO ALLOW VERMONT STATE POLICE OFFICERS
AND CORRECTIONAL OFFICERS TO WEAR RELIGIOUS HEAD
COVERINGS
(a) Not later than October 1, 2026, the Department of Public Safety shall
adopt or amend a policy to permit a law enforcement officer serving the
Vermont State Police to wear a religious head covering in accordance with the
law enforcement officer’s religious beliefs while the law enforcement officer is
VT LEG #385656 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.285
2026 Page 2 of 2
on duty and wearing a uniform or other authorized attire, except where the use
of tight-fitting protective headgear is required.
(b) Not later than October 1, 2026, the Department of Corrections shall
adopt or amend a policy to permit a correctional officer to wear a religious
head covering in accordance with the correctional officer’s religious beliefs
while the correctional officer is on duty and wearing a uniform or other
authorized attire, except where the use of tight-fitting protective headgear is
required.
Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on passage.
VT LEG #385656 v.1